Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin COUNTY STATE-AID HIGHWAY 46 SAFETY IMPROVEMENTS; APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin $18,650,000 is appropriated from the bond proceeds fund to the commissioner of transportation for a grant to Dakota County to improve safety and capacity on County State-Aid Highway 46 (160th Street/Brandel Avenue) from marked Trunk Highway 3 east through the marked Trunk Highway 52 interchange to County Road 48. The project will reconstruct County State-Aid Highway 46 from a two-lane highway to a divided four-lane highway from marked Trunk Highway 3 to the marked Trunk Highway 52 interchange to County Road 48 in the cities of Coates and Rosemount and Empire Township. This appropriation may be used for preliminary and final design, and to engineer, acquire right of way and temporary and permanent easements, inspect, construct, and reconstruct County State-Aid Highway 46 and other roads to support the completion of the project, including traffic control, environmental cleanup and mitigation, multipurpose pedestrian and bicycle facilities, public utility relocation and storm water management. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Bond sale. new text end new text begin To provide the money appropriated in this section from the bond proceeds fund, the commissioner of management and budget shall sell and issue bonds of the state in an amount up to $18,650,000 in the manner, upon the terms, and with the effect prescribed by Minnesota Statutes, sections 16A.631 to 16A.675, and by the Minnesota Constitution, article XI, sections 4 to 7. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end